Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
LEASING WATER RIGHTS - CITIES OF OVER 200,000

31-35-201. Leasing of water - no rights vested.

In the event any municipal appropriator of water, having a population in excess of two hundred thousand, leases, after May 12, 1931, water not needed by it for immediate use, no rights shall become vested to a continued leasing or to a continuance of the conditions concerning any return water arising therefrom so as to defeat or impair the right to terminate the leases or change the place of use. Any leasing shall not injuriously affect rights vested in other appropriators prior to said date. Nothing in this section shall authorize an appropriator to recapture water for a second use after it has once been used by it.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1248, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-201 as it existed prior to 1975.